New York, session 2025-2026, A843.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 391-w of the general business law, 2 as added by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the general business 3 law relating to prohibiting third-party restaurant reservation services 4 from arranging unauthorized restaurant reservations with food service 5 establishments, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 9365-A and 6 A. 10215-A, is amended to read as follows: 7 3. Any person who violates, or causes another person to violate, a 8 provision of this section [or any rule promulgated pursuant thereto], 9 shall be subject to a civil penalty that shall not exceed one thousand 10 dollars for each violation. Violations by third-party restaurant reser- 11 vation services under this section shall accrue on a daily basis for 12 each day and for each food service establishment with respect to which a 13 violation of this section [or any rule promulgated pursuant to this 14 section] was committed. [A proceeding to recover any civil penalty or 15 restitution authorized pursuant to this section may be brought within 16 any agency of the state designated to conduct such proceedings.] 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 18 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the general business 19 law relating to prohibiting third-party restaurant reservation services 20 from arranging unauthorized restaurant reservations with food service 21 establishments, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 9365-A and 22 A. 10215-A, takes effect. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02932-01-5